Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.300

Determination of rules and procedure.

(1) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the parties are free to agree on the procedure to be followed by the arbitral tribunal in conducting the proceedings.

(2) Failing such agreement, the arbitral tribunal may, subject to the provisions of this chapter, conduct the arbitration in such manner as it considers appropriate. The power conferred upon the arbitral tribunal includes the power to determine the admissibility, relevance, materiality, and weight of any evidence.

[ 2015 c 276 s 30.]